Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.115

Child safety training—High-potency synthetic opioids and other substances.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the administrative office of the courts shall develop, deliver, and regularly update training regarding child safety and the risk and danger presented to children and youth by high-potency synthetic opioids and other substances impacting families.

(2) The training established in this section must be:

(a) Informed by the information developed under section 109, chapter 328, Laws of 2024; and

(b) Developed for and made available to judicial officers and system partners in the dependency court system.

[ 2024 c 328 s 110.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 328: See note following RCW 13.34.050.